Indiana, session 2026, SB284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-29.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 29.1. Law Enforcement Civilian Oversight Boards and
Commissions
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to all units.
Sec. 2. This chapter does not apply to a merit board or
commission established under IC 36-8-3.5.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement agency" has
the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-183.
Sec. 4. Except as provided in section 2 of this chapter, any type
of law enforcement civilian oversight board or commission or any
other entity established by a unit to provide civilian oversight over
a law enforcement agency in existence on July 1, 2026, or
established after June 30, 2026, may operate only in an advisory
capacity to the applicable law enforcement agency and does not
have binding authority over the law enforcement agency.
SEA 284

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 284